Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Part 2 Contest of Validity or Enforcement

15-23.1-605.
Notice of registration of order.

When a support order or income-withholding order issued in another state or foreign support order is registered, the registering tribunal of this state shall notify the nonregistering party. The notice must be accompanied by a copy of the registered order and the documents and relevant information accompanying the order.

A notice must inform the non-registering party:

That a registered order is enforceable as of the date of registration in the same manner as an order issued by a tribunal of this state;

That a hearing to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order must be requested within twenty (20) days after notice unless the registered order is under §

15-23.1-707

;

That failure to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order in a timely manner will result in confirmation of the order and enforcement of the order and the alleged arrearages, and precludes further contest of that order with respect to any matter that could have been asserted; and

Of the amount of any alleged arrearages.

If the registering party asserts that two (2) or more orders are in effect, a notice must also:

Identify the two (2) or more orders and the order alleged by the registering party to be the controlling order and the consolidated arrears, if any;

Notify the nonregistering party of the right to a determination of which is the controlling order;

State that the procedures provided in subsection (b) apply to the determination of which is the controlling order; and

State that failure to contest the validity or enforcement of the order alleged to be the controlling order in a timely manner may result in confirmation that the order is the controlling order.

Upon registration of an income-withholding order for enforcement, the support enforcement agency or the registering tribunal shall notify the obligor’s employer pursuant to the income-withholding law of this state.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 15; P.L. 2006, ch. 69, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 76, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 263, § 1.

15-23.1-606.
Procedure to contest validity or enforcement of registered support order.

A non-registering party seeking to contest the validity or enforcement of a registered order in this state shall request a hearing within the time required by section 605. The non-registering party may seek to vacate the registration, to assert any defense to an allegation of noncompliance with the registered order, or to contest the remedies being sought or the amount of any alleged arrearages pursuant to §

15-23.1-607

.

If the non-registering party fails to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order in a timely manner, the order is confirmed by operation of law.

If a non-registering party requests a hearing to contest the validity or enforcement of the registered order, the registering tribunal shall schedule the matter for a hearing and give notice to the parties of the date, time, and place of the hearing.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 15; P.L. 2006, ch. 69, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 76, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 263, § 1.

15-23.1-607.
Contest of registration or enforcement.

A party contesting the validity or enforcement of a registered support order or seeking to vacate the registration has the burden of proving one or more of the following defenses:

The issuing tribunal lacked personal jurisdiction over the contesting party;

The order was obtained by fraud;

The order has been vacated, suspended, or modified by a later order;

The issuing tribunal has stayed the order pending appeal;

There is a defense under the law of this state to the remedy sought;

Full or partial payment has been made;

The statute of limitations under § 15-23.1-604 (Choice of law) precludes enforcement of some or all of the arrearages; or

The alleged controlling order is not the controlling order.

If a party presents evidence establishing a full or partial defense under subsection (a) of this section, a tribunal may stay enforcement of a registered support order, continue the proceeding to permit production of additional relevant evidence, and issue other appropriate orders. An uncontested portion of the registered support order may be enforced by all remedies available under the law of this state.

If the contesting party does not establish a defense under subsection (a) of this section to the validity or enforcement of a registered support order, the registering tribunal shall issue an order confirming the order.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 15; P.L. 2006, ch. 69, § 2; P.L. 2006, ch. 76, § 2; P.L. 2011, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 263, § 1.

15-23.1-608.
Confirmed order.

Confirmation of a registered support order, whether by operation of law or after notice and a hearing, precludes further contest of the order with respect to any matter that could have been asserted at the time of registration.

History of Section.

P.L. 1997, ch. 170, § 15; P.L. 2011, ch. 243, § 1; P.L. 2011, ch. 263, § 1.